en: Fur Clothing
fr: Fourrures, Fourrure

en: Rain Pants
xx: Rain Pants
cs: Kalhoty proti dešti
da: Regnbukser
de: Regenhosen
es: Pantalones impermeables
fr: Pantalons de pluie
it: Pantaloni impermeabili
ja: レインパンツ
nl: Regenbroeken
no: Regnbukser
pl: Spodnie przeciwdeszczowe
pt: Calças impermeáveis para chuva
ru: Непромокаемые брюки
sv: Regnbyxor
tr: Yağmur Pantolonları

en: Rain Suits
xx: Rain Suits
cs: Obleky proti dešti
da: Regnsæt
de: Regenanzüge
es: Trajes impermeables
fr: Ensembles imperméables
it: Abiti impermeabili
ja: レインスーツ
nl: Regenpakken
no: Regndresser
pl: Stroje przeciwdeszczowe
pt: Roupas para chuva
ru: Дождевая одежда
sv: Regnställ
tr: Alt Üst Yağmurluklar

en: Snow Pants & Suits
xx: Snow Pants & Suits
cs: Zimní kalhoty a kombinézy
da: Skibukser og skisæt
de: Schneehosen und - anzüge
es: Pantalones y trajes para nieve
fr: Pantalons et combinaisons de ski
it: Pantaloni e completi da neve
ja: スノーウェア
nl: Sneeuwbroeken en sneeuwpakken
no: Vinterbukser og -dresser
pl: Spodnie i kombinezony na śnieg
pt: Calças e macacões de inverno
ru: Зимние штаны и комбинезоны
sv: Kläder och byxor för vintersport
tr: Kar Pantolonları ve Tulumları

en: Vests
xx: Vests
cs: Vesty
da: Veste
de: Westen
es: Chalecos
fr: Gilets et vestes sans manches, Gilets, Gilet
it: Gilet
ja: ベスト
nl: Vesten
no: Vester
pl: Kamizelki
pt: Coletes
ru: Жилеты
sv: Västar
tr: Yelekler

en: Outfit Sets
xx: Outfit Sets
cs: Soupravy oblečení
da: Tøjsæt
de: Kombinationen
es: Conjuntos de ropa
fr: Ensembles de vêtements
it: Completi
ja: セットアップ
nl: Kledingsets
no: Klessett
pl: Komplety ubrań
pt: Conjuntos de roupas
ru: Наборы одежды
sv: Klädset
tr: Takımlar

en: Feather & Down Fillings
fr: Plumes et duvets, Plumes (et duvets)

en: Pants
xx: Pants
cs: Kalhoty
da: Bukser
de: Hosen
es: Pantalones
fr: Pantalons, Pantalon
it: Pantaloni
ja: パンツ・ズボン
nl: Lange broeken
no: Bukser
pl: Spodnie
pt: Calças
ru: Штаны
sv: Byxor
tr: Pantolonlar

en: Capri Pants
xx: Capri Pants
fr: Pantacourts, Pantacourt

en: Leggings
xx: Leggings
fr: Leggings, Legging

en: Shirts & Tops
xx: Shirts & Tops
cs: Košile a topy
da: Skjorter og toppe
de: Shirts & Tops
es: Camisas y tops
fr: Hauts, Chemises, Chemise
it: Camicie e top
ja: トップス
nl: Overhemden\, shirts en bovenstukjes
no: Skjorter og topper
pl: Podkoszulki i topy
pt: Camisetas e tops
ru: Рубашки и топы
sv: Skjortor och toppar
tr: Gömlekler ve Üstlükler

en: Sweatshirts
xx: Sweatshirts
fr: Sweats, Sweat

en: Shorts
xx: Shorts
cs: Šortky
da: Shorts
de: Shorts
es: Pantalones cortos
fr: Shorts, Short
it: Pantaloncini
ja: ショートパンツ
nl: Korte broeken
no: Kortbukser
pl: Szorty
pt: Shorts
ru: Шорты
sv: Shorts
tr: Şortlar

en: Bermuda Shorts
xx: Bermuda Shorts
fr: Bermudas, Bermuda

en: Skirts
xx: Skirts
cs: Sukně
da: Nederdele
de: Röcke
es: Faldas
fr: Jupes, Jupe
it: Gonne
ja: スカート
nl: Rokken
no: Skjørt
pl: Spódnice
pt: Saias
ru: Юбки
sv: Kjolar
tr: Etekler

en: Knee-Length Skirts
xx: Knee-Length Skirts
cs: Sukně po kolena
da: Knælange skørter
de: Knielange Röcke
es: Faldas hasta la rodilla
fr: Jupes mi-longues
it: Gonne al ginocchio
ja: ひざ丈スカート
nl: Rokken tot op de knie
no: Knelange skjørt
pl: Spódnice do kolan
pt: Saias até o joelho
ru: Юбки до колен
sv: Knälånga kjolar
tr: Diz Boyu Etekler

en: Long Skirts
xx: Long Skirts
cs: Dlouhé sukně
da: Lange skørter
de: Lange Röcke
es: Faldas largas
fr: Jupes longues
it: Gonne lunghe
ja: ロングスカート
nl: Lange rokken
no: Lange skjørt
pl: Spódnice długie
pt: Saias longas
ru: Длинные юбки
sv: Långa kjolar
tr: Uzun Etekler

en: Mini Skirts
xx: Mini Skirts
cs: Minisukně
da: Miniskørter
de: Miniröcke
es: Minifaldas
fr: Jupettes
it: Minigonne
ja: ミニスカート
nl: Minirokken
no: Miniskjørt
pl: Spódnice mini
pt: Minissaias
ru: Мини-юбки
sv: Minikjolar
tr: Mini Etekler

en: Skorts
xx: Skorts
cs: Kalhotové sukně
da: Skorts
de: Skorts
es: Faldas pantalón
fr: Jupes-shorts
it: Gonne pantalone
ja: キュロット
nl: Broekrokjes
no: Kortbukseskjørt
pl: Spódniczki ze spodenkami
pt: Short-saia
ru: Юбки-шорты
sv: Skorts
tr: Şort Etekler

en: Sleepwear & Loungewear
xx: Sleepwear & Loungewear
cs: Noční a domácí oblečení
da: Nattøj og fritidstøj
de: Nachtwäsche & Loungewear
es: Ropa para dormir y para estar en casa
fr: Vêtements de nuit et de détente
it: Abbigliamento da notte e da camera
ja: ナイトウェア・ルームウエア
nl: Nachtkleding en loungewear
no: Nattøy
pl: Piżamy i ubrania na co dzień
pt: Pijamas e roupas casuais
ru: Пижамы и одежда для отдыха
sv: Sovkläder och myskläder
tr: Yatak ve Ev Kıyafetleri